District of Columbia statutes.
1-129.34

Tax-exempt status.

Contributions to the New Columbia Statehood Fund shall be tax deductible.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 34
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 101(b), 62 DCR 1884